test/src/morphology/N-makw9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - makõ2: # Noun (9) makõ2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     makõ+N+Sg+Nom: makõ
     makõ+N+Sg+Gen: magõhõ
     makõ+N+Sg+Par: magõhõt
     makõ+N+Sg+Ill: magõhõhe
     makõ+N+Pl+Gen: magõhidõ
     makõ+N+Pl+Par: magõhit
     makõ+N+Pl+Ill: magõhihe
     makõ+N+Pl+All: magõhilõ
